Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 23.2 Preservation of Agricultural Use

2-23.2-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the preservation of agriculture by protecting persons engaged in agricultural operations on agricultural lands, the development rights to which have been conveyed against changes in rules, regulations and
requirements that would impair the ability to continue agricultural operations that were allowable at the time of the transfer of the development rights.

History of Section.
P.L. 2006, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 77, § 1.

2-23.2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms and phrases shall have the meaning set forth in this section unless the context indicates a different meaning or intent:

“Agricultural land” means land conforming to the definition of agricultural land set forth in §

42-82-2

.

“Agricultural operation” means any activity defined as an agricultural operation in §

2-23-4

.

“Development right” means a development right conforming to the definition of a development right as set forth in §

42-82-2

.

History of Section.
P.L. 2006, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 77, § 1.

2-23.2-3.
Right to agricultural use.

Unless explicitly curtailed, defined or restricted by an instrument conveying development rights to agricultural land, the right to engage in agricultural operations shall include all activities reasonably associated with and/or necessary to such agricultural
operations that were allowable on the agricultural land as of the date of the final execution of the instrument conveying such development rights. A right to engage in such allowable agricultural operations shall be deemed to be an
implied condition of the instrument.

History of Section.
P.L. 2006, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 77, § 1.

2-23.2-4.
Effect of rules and regulations.

All rules, regulations, ordinances and other requirements of the state and agencies, corporations, boards, commissions and political subdivisions of the state that are applicable to the conduct of agricultural operations allowable as of the date of the
final execution of the instrument conveying development rights shall continue to apply to agricultural operations on such agricultural land. Unless specifically provided for by law or unless necessary to protect public health, safety
or the environment from imminent hazard, no rule, regulation or requirement adopted by any agency, corporation, board, commission and/or political subdivision of the state after the date of such final execution of an instrument conveying
development rights shall be deemed to diminish, restrict or impair such allowable agricultural activities, except as may be necessary not to impair the actual agricultural operations of another person engaged in agricultural operations,
including those who have not conveyed development rights.

The limitations herein established shall not be deemed to diminish or impair the adoption, amendment, implementation, or enforcement of rules, regulations, ordinances, or other requirements that do not directly affect actual agricultural operations that
are undertaken for the purposes of producing agricultural products.

History of Section.
P.L. 2006, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 77, § 1.

2-23.2-5.
Construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all instruments conveying development rights in effect as of or after the effective date of this chapter [June 14, 2006].

History of Section.
P.L. 2006, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 77, § 1.

2-23.2-6.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or determination made under this chapter, or application of this chapter to any person, agency or circumstances is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter and its application to
any person, agency or circumstances shall not be affected by the invalidity. The invalidity of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the remainder of this chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 2006, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 77, § 1.